Washington statutes.
RCW 31.24.205

Supervisory direction and conservatorship.

The director has the same power and authority to exercise supervisory direction and conservatorship of, and to issue cease and desist orders upon, a business development company organized under this chapter, as the director has in regard to a bank under *Title 30 RCW.

[ 2006 c 87 s 22.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Title 30 RCW was recodified and/or repealed pursuant to 2014 c 37, effective January 5, 2015.